California statutes. Civil Code
(g) “Transitional housing program” means any program which is designed to assist homeless persons in obtaining skills necessary for independent living in permanent housing and which has all of the following components:

(1) Comprehensive social service programs which include regular individualized case management services and which may include alcohol and drug abuse counseling, self-improvement education, employment and training assistance services, and independent living skills development.

(2) Use of a program unit as a temporary housing unit in a structured living environment which use is conditioned upon compliance
 with the transitional housing program rules and regulations.

(3) A rule or regulation which specifies an occupancy period of not less than 30 days, but not more than 24 months.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 714, Sec. 5.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Temporary Restraining Order and Injunction [1954.13. - 1954.16.]

1954.13.

(a) The program operator may seek, on its own behalf or on behalf of other participants, project employees, or persons residing within 100 feet of the program site, a temporary restraining order and an injunction prohibiting abuse or program misconduct as provided in this chapter. A program operator may not seek a temporary restraining order, pursuant to this section, against a participant after the participant has been under contract with the program
 operator for at least six months or longer, except when an action is pending against the participant or a temporary restraining order is in effect and subject to further orders. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a person residing within 100 feet of the program site to seek a temporary restraining order or injunction under this chapter.

(b) Upon filing a petition for an injunction under this chapter, the program operator may obtain a temporary restraining order in accordance with the provisions of this section. No temporary restraining order shall be issued without notice to the opposite party, unless it shall appear from the facts shown by the affidavit that great or irreparable harm would result to the program operator, a program participant, or an individual residing within 100 feet of the program site before the matter can be heard on notice. The program operator or the program operator’s attorney shall state in an
 affidavit to the court (1) that within a reasonable time prior to the application for a temporary restraining order he or she informed the opposing party or his or her attorney at what time and where the application would be made, (2) that he or she in good faith attempted to so inform the opposing party and his or her attorney but was unable to so inform the opposing attorney or his or her party, specifying the efforts made to contact them, or (3) that for reasons specified he or she should not be required to inform the opposing party or his or her attorney.

A temporary restraining order may be granted upon an affidavit which, to the satisfaction of the court, shows reasonable proof of program misconduct or abuse by the participant, and that great or irreparable harm would result. A temporary restraining order granted under this section shall remain in effect, at the court’s discretion, for a period not to exceed five days, unless otherwise modified, extended, or
 terminated by the court.

(c) The matter shall be made returnable on an order requiring cause to be shown why the injunction should not be granted, not later than five days from the date of the order. When the matter comes up for hearing, the party who obtained the temporary restraining order shall be ready to proceed and shall have personally served upon the opposite party at least two days prior to the hearing, a copy of the petition, a copy of the temporary restraining order, if any, the notice of hearing, copies of all affidavits to be used in the application, and a copy of any points and authorities in support of the petition. If the party who obtained the temporary restraining order is not ready, or if he or she fails to serve a copy of his or her petition, affidavits, and points and authorities, as herein required, the court shall dissolve the temporary restraining order. The court may, upon the filing of an affidavit by the program
 operator or his or her attorney, that the participant could not be served on time, reissue any temporary restraining order previously issued pursuant to this section and dissolved by the court for failure to serve the participant. An order reissued under this section shall state on its face the new date of expiration of the order. No fees shall be charged for the reissuance of any order under this section. The participant shall be entitled to a continuance, provided that the request is made on or before the hearing date and the hearing shall be set for a date within 15 days of the application, unless the participant requests a later date. The court may extend, or modify and extend, any temporary restraining order until the date and time upon which the hearing is held. The participant may file a response which explains, excuses, justifies, or denies the alleged conduct. No fee shall be charged for the filing of a response. At the hearing, the judge shall receive any testimony or evidence that is relevant, and
 may make an independent inquiry. If the judge finds by clear and convincing evidence that program misconduct or abuse exists, an injunction shall issue prohibiting that conduct. An injunction issued pursuant to this section shall have a duration of not more than one year. At any time within the three months before the expiration of the injunction, the program operator may apply for renewal of the injunction by filing a new petition for an injunction under this section.

(d) In addition to orders restraining abuse, the court may, upon clear and convincing evidence of abuse, issue an order excluding the participant from the program site, or restraining the participant from coming within 200 feet of the program site, upon an affidavit which, to the satisfaction of the court, shows clear and convincing evidence of abuse of a project employee, another participant, or a person who resides within 100 feet of the program site, by the participant and
 that great or irreparable injury would result to one of these individuals if the order is not issued. An order excluding the participant from the program site may be included in the temporary restraining order only in an emergency where it is necessary to protect another participant, a project employee, or an individual who lives within 100 feet of the project site from imminent serious bodily injury.

(e) Nothing in this chapter shall preclude either party from representation by private counsel or from appearing on his or her own behalf.

(f) The notice of hearing specified in subdivision (c) shall contain on its face the name and phone number of an office funded by the federal Legal Services Corporation which provides legal services to low-income persons in the county in which the action is filed. The notice shall indicate that this number may be called for legal advice concerning
 the filing of a response to the petition.

(g) Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the program operator’s right to utilize other existing civil remedies. An order issued under this section shall not affect the rights of anyone not named in the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 714, Sec. 5.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.14.

(a) The clerk shall transmit a copy of each temporary restraining order or injunction or modification or termination thereof, granted under this chapter, by the close of the business day on which the order was granted, to the law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction over the program site. Each law enforcement agency may make available information as to the existence and current status of these orders to law enforcement officers responding to the scene of
 reported abuse or program misconduct.

(b) Any willful disobedience of any temporary restraining order or injunction granted under this section shall be a misdemeanor pursuant to Section 166 of the Penal Code.

(c) If a participant is found in contempt of a court order issued pursuant to this section, the court may, in addition to any other punishment, modify the order to exclude the participant from the program site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 714, Sec. 5.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.15.

If a participant has violated an order issued under Section 1954.13, the participant shall be considered to have failed to perform the conditions of the agreement under which the property is held as provided in subsection 3 of Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure, which conditions cannot afterward be performed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 714, Sec. 5.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.16.

The Judicial Council shall promulgate forms and related instructions to implement the procedures required by this chapter. The petition and response forms shall be simple and concise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 714, Sec. 5.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Recovery of Dwelling [1954.17. - 1954.18.]

1954.17.

If, after hearing pursuant to this chapter, an order excluding the participant from the program site is issued, the program operator may, without further notice, take possession of the participant’s dwelling unit on the program site. The program operator shall have the same rights to the dwelling unit as if it had been recovered after abandonment in accordance with Section 1951.3 and without objection of the participant. If other participants, including the defendant participant’s
 family members, reside in the dwelling unit, the abandonment shall be deemed only to affect the rights of the individual or individuals against whom the order was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 714, Sec. 5.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.18.

If the program operator takes possession of the property, pursuant to this article, the program operator shall give the subject participant a reasonable opportunity to remove the participant’s property from his or her dwelling unit on the program site, and, thereafter, the program operator may consider the remaining subject participant’s property to be abandoned property pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1980).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 714, Sec. 5.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Water Service [1954.201. - 1954.219.]

1954.201.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to do both of the following:

(a) To encourage the conservation of water in multifamily residential rental buildings through means either within the landlord’s or the tenant’s control.

(b) To establish that the practices involving the submetering of dwelling units for water service are just and
reasonable, and include appropriate safeguards for both tenants and landlords.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.202.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Billing agent” means a person or entity who contracts to provide submetering services to a landlord, including billing.

(b) “Landlord” means an owner of residential rental property. “Landlord” does not include a tenant who rents all or a portion of a dwelling unit to subtenants. “Landlord” does not include a common
interest development, as defined in Section 4100 of the Civil Code.

(c) “Property” means real property containing two or more dwelling units that is served by a single master meter.

(d) “Ratio utility billing system” means the allocation of water and sewer costs to tenants based on the square footage, occupancy, or other physical factors of a dwelling unit.

(e) “Rental agreement” includes a fixed-term lease.

(f) “Renting” includes leasing, whether on a periodic or fixed-term basis.

(g) “Submeter” means a device that measures water consumption of an individual rental unit within a multiunit residential structure or mixed-use residential and commercial structure, and that is owned and
operated by the landlord of the structure or the landlord’s agent. As used in this section, “multiunit residential structure” and “mixed-use residential and commercial structure” mean real property containing two or more dwelling units.

(h) “Water service” includes any charges, whether presented for payment on local water purveyor bills, tax bills, or bills from other entities, related to water treatment, distribution, or usage, including, but not limited to, water, sewer, stormwater, and flood control.

(i) “Water purveyor” means a water purveyor as defined in Section 512 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.203.

(a) Submeters used to separately bill tenants for water service shall satisfy each of the following requirements:

(1) The submeter shall be inspected, tested, and verified for commercial purposes pursuant to law, including, but not limited to, Section 12500.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) The submeter shall conform to
all laws regarding installation, maintenance, repair, and use, including, but not limited to, regulations established pursuant to Section 12107 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) The submeter shall measure only water that is supplied for the exclusive use of the particular dwelling unit, and only to an area within the exclusive possession and control of the tenant of the dwelling unit.

(4) The submeter shall be capable of being accessed and read by the tenant of the dwelling unit and read by the landlord without entering the dwelling unit. A submeter installed before January 1, 2018, may be read by the landlord after entry into the unit, in accordance with this chapter and Section 1954.

(5) The submeter shall be reinspected and recalibrated within the time limits specified in law or regulation.

(b) This section does not require a water purveyor to assume responsibility for ensuring compliance with any law or regulation governing installation, certification, maintenance, and testing of submeters and associated onsite plumbing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.204.

Before executing a rental agreement, a landlord who intends to charge a tenant separately from rent for water service in a property with submeters shall clearly disclose the following information to the tenant, in writing, in at least l0-point type, which may be incorporated into the rental agreement:

(a) That the tenant will be billed for water service separately from the rent.

(b) An estimate of the monthly bill for water service for dwelling units at the property based on either of the following:

(1) The average or median bill for water service for comparative dwelling units at the property over any three of the past six months.

(2) The amount of the bill based upon average indoor water use of a family of four of approximately 200 gallons per day, and including all other monthly charges that will be assessed. Estimates for other gallons per day may also be included. The estimate shall include a statement that the average family of four uses about 200 gallons of water each day.

(c) The due dates and payment procedures for bills for water service.

(d) A mailing
address, an email address, and a toll-free telephone number or a local telephone number for the tenant to contact the landlord or billing agent with questions regarding the water service billing and the days and hours for regular telephone service at either number.

(e) That the monthly bill for water service may only include the following charges:

(1) Payment due for the amount of usage as measured by the submeter and charged at allowable rates in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 1954.205.

(2) Payment of a portion of the fixed fee charged by the water purveyors for water service.

(3) A fee for the landlord’s or billing agent’s costs in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1954.205.

(4) Any late fee, with the amounts and times assessed, in compliance with Section 1954.213.

(f) A statement that the tenant shall notify the landlord of any leaks, drips, water fixtures that do not shut off properly, including, but not limited to, a toilet, or other problems with the water system, including, but not limited to, problems with water-saving devices, and that the landlord is required to investigate, and, if necessary, repair these problems within 21 days, otherwise, the water bill will be adjusted pursuant to law.

(g) A mailing address, an email address, and a toll-free telephone number or a local telephone number for the tenant to use to contact the landlord, or an agent of the landlord, to report any leaks, drips, water fixtures that do not shut off properly, including, but not limited to, a toilet, or
other problems with the water system, including, but not limited to, problems with water-saving devices.

(h) A statement that the landlord shall provide any of the following information if asked by the tenant:

(1) The location of the submeter.

(2) The calculations used to determine a monthly bill.

(3) The date the submeter was last certified for use, and the date it is next scheduled for certification, if known.

(i) A statement that if the tenant believes that the submeter reading is inaccurate or the submeter is malfunctioning, the tenant shall first notify the landlord in writing and request an investigation. A tenant shall be provided with notice that if an alleged submeter malfunction
is not resolved by the landlord, a tenant may contact the local county sealer and request that the submeter be tested. Contact information for the county sealer shall be included in the disclosure to the tenant.

(j) A statement that this disclosure is only a general overview of the laws regarding submeters and that the laws can be found at Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1954.201) of Title 5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, available online or at most libraries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.205.

(a) As part of the regular bill for water service, a landlord shall only bill a tenant for the following water service:

(1) A charge for volumetric usage, which may be calculated in any the following ways:

(A) The amount shall be calculated by first determining the proportion of the tenant’s usage, as shown by the submeter, to the
total usage as shown by the water purveyor’s billing. The dollar amount billed to the tenant for usage shall be in that same proportion to the dollar amount for usage shown by the water purveyor’s billing.

(B) If the water purveyor charges for volumetric usage based on a tiered rate schedule, the landlord may calculate the charge for a tenant’s volumetric usage as described in subparagraph (A) or the landlord may instead divide each tier’s volume evenly among the number of dwelling units, and the rate applicable to each block shall be applied to the consumption recorded for each dwelling unit.

(C) If the water purveyor charges the property rates on a per-dwelling unit basis, the tenants may be charged at those exact per unit rates.

(2) Any recurring fixed charge for water service billed to the property by the water
purveyors that, at the landlord’s discretion, shall be calculated by either of the following:

(A) The tenant’s proportion of the total fixed charges charged to the property. The tenant’s proportion shall be based on the percentage of the tenant’s volumetric water use in relation to the total volumetric water use of the entire property, as shown on the property’s water bill during that period.

(B) Dividing the total fixed charges charged to the property equally among the total number of residential units and nonresidential units at the property.

(3) A billing, administrative, or other fee for the landlord’s and billing agent’s costs, which shall be the lesser of an amount not to exceed four dollars and seventy-five cents ($4.75), as adjusted pursuant to this paragraph or 25 percent of the amount billed pursuant to
paragraph (1). Beginning January 1, 2018, the maximum fee authorized by this paragraph may be adjusted each calendar year by the landlord, no higher than a commensurate increase in the Consumer Price Index based on a California fiscal year average for the previous fiscal year, for all urban consumers, as determined by the Department of Finance.

(4) A late charge as assessed pursuant to Section 1954.213.

(b) If a submeter reading for the beginning or end of a billing period is, in good faith, not available, the landlord shall bill the tenant according to Section 1954.212.

(c) This section does not prohibit a landlord or the landlord’s billing agent from including any other lawful charges, including, but not limited to, rent, on the same bill.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.206.

(a) Submeters shall be read within three days of the same point in each billing cycle.

(b) Payments shall be due at the same point in each billing cycle. A tenant may agree in writing to receive a bill electronically. A tenant may rescind authorization for electronic delivery of bills at any time. The landlord shall have 30 days to comply with any change in how a tenant requests to receive a
bill. A tenant shall not be required to pay a bill electronically.

(c) A bill shall include and separately set forth the following information:

(1) The submeter reading for the beginning date and ending date of the billing cycle, the dates read, and the indicated consumption as determined by subtracting the amount of the beginning date submeter reading from the amount of the ending date submeter reading. If the unit of measure is in something other than gallons, the indicated consumption shall be expressed in gallons.

(2) The amounts charged pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1954.205.

(3) The rate or rates charged for the volumetric charge per unit of measure.

(4) The amount, if any,
due from the previous month’s bill.

(5) The amount, if any, due from bills prior to the previous month’s bill.

(6) The late fee, if any, imposed on amounts specified in paragraph (4) or (5).

(7) The total amount due for the billing period.

(8) The due date for the payment.

(9) If a late fee is charged by the landlord, a statement of when the late fees would apply.

(10) The procedure to contact the landlord or billing agent with questions or concerns regarding the bill. Upon request of the tenant, the landlord or billing agent shall respond in writing to any questions or disputes from the tenant. If a billing agent is used,
the name of the billing agent shall be disclosed. The tenant shall be provided a mailing address, email address, and telephone number, which shall be either a toll-free or a local number, and the time of regular telephone hours for contact regarding billing inquiries.

(11) A statement that the landlord or billing agent is not the water purveyor that includes the name of the local water purveyor providing the water service to the master meter.

(12) A mailing address, an email address, and a toll-free telephone number or a local telephone number for the tenant to use to contact the landlord, or an agent of the landlord, to report any leaks, drips, water fixtures that do not shut off properly, including, but not limited to, a toilet, or other problems with the water system, including, but not limited to, problems with water-saving devices.

(d) Notwithstanding paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (c), a separate bill may be provided for past due amounts if past due amounts are not included on the current month’s bill.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.207.

(a) At the beginning of a tenancy, a submeter shall be read after the tenant takes possession. If the regular reading occurs less than five days prior to the tenant taking possession, that reading may be substituted to establish usage. If the submeter is manually read, the first bill may be estimated based on the rate established in subdivision (b) of Section 1954.212.

(b) For a water-service
bill at the end of a tenancy, the submeter shall be read within five days, if possible. If the submeter cannot be read within five days at the end of a tenancy, the bill amount for the final month shall be based on the bill amount for the previous month.

(c) The landlord may, at his or her discretion, deduct an unpaid water service bill from the security deposit during or upon termination of a tenancy, if the last water service bill showing the amount due is attached to the documentation required by Section 1950.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.208.

Unless it can be documented that a penalty is primarily the result of a tenant’s or tenants’ failure to comply with state or local water use regulations or restrictions, or both, regarding wasting of water, a landlord shall not charge, recover, or allow to be charged or recovered, fees incurred by the landlord from the water purveyors, billing agent, or any other person for any deposit, disconnection, reconnection, late payment by the landlord, or any other penalty assessed against
the landlord. This section shall not prevent a landlord from charging a tenant for the tenant’s late payment of any bill.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.209.

The landlord shall maintain and make available in writing, at the tenant’s written or electronic request, within seven days after the request, the following:

(a) The date the submeter was last inspected, tested, and verified, and the date by which it shall be reinspected, tested, and verified under law, if available. If this information is not available, the landlord shall disclose that the information is not
available.

(b) The data used to calculate the tenant’s bill, as follows:

(1) The most recent water bill for the property’s master water meter showing the recurring fixed charge for water service billed to the property by the water purveyor, and the usage charges for the property, including any tiered amounts.

(2) Any other bills for water service, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 1954.202, for the property.

(3) The number of dwelling units in the property used in the last billing period to calculate the tenant’s water service charges.

(4) If not shown on the bill for the property, the per unit charges for volumetric water usage, including any tiered amounts.

(5) The formula used to calculate the charge for the tenant’s volumetric water usage.

(c) The location of the submeter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.210.

(a) If a tenant notifies the landlord of, or the landlord otherwise becomes aware of, a leak, a drip, a water fixture that does not shut off property, including, but not limited to, a toilet, a problem with a water-saving device, or other problem with the water system that causes constant or abnormally high water usage, or a submeter reading indicates constant or abnormal high water usage, the landlord shall have the condition investigated, and, if warranted,
rectify the condition.

(b) A tenant shall not remove any water fixtures or water-saving devices that have been installed by the landlord.

(c) If the condition is rectified more than 21 days after the tenant provides notice to the landlord or the landlord otherwise becomes aware of a leak, a drip, a water fixture that does not shut off properly, including, but not limited to, a toilet, a problem with a water-saving device, or other problem with the water system that causes constant or abnormally high water usage, or a submeter reading indicates constant or abnormally high water usage, pursuant to subdivision (a), the tenant’s volumetric usage for any month or months that include the period between 21 days after the initial investigation and the repair shall be deemed to be fifteen dollars ($15) or actual usage, whichever is less. At the landlord’s option, if submeter readings are
available to determine the usage at a point prior to investigation and a point following repair, usage shall be deemed to be fifty cents ($0.50) per day for those days between the two submeter readings or actual usage, whichever is less.

(d) If the condition remains unrectified for 180 days after investigation, no further volumetric usage charges may be imposed until the condition is repaired. 

(e) If, in order to comply with subdivision (a), the landlord has provided notice pursuant to Section 1954, and the tenant has failed to provide access to the dwelling unit, then the charges shall not be determined pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d).

(f) If the local water purveyor notifies the landlord of constant or abnormally high water usage at the property, the landlord shall investigate and, if possible, rectify the
cause of the high water usage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.211.

The landlord may enter a dwelling unit as follows: 

(a) For the purpose of installing, repairing, or replacing a submeter, or for the purpose of investigating or rectifying a condition causing constant or abnormally high water usage, as required by subdivision (a) of Section 1954.210, if the requirements of Section 1954 are met.

(b) To read a submeter,
if the requirements of this chapter and Section 1954 are met. Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 1954, notice shall be given only in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.212.

(a) If a monthly submeter reading necessary to measure volumetric usage is unavailable, and the tenant has provided access to the submeter, the tenant may be charged 75 percent of the average amount billed for volumetric usage for the last three months for which complete billing information is available. The adjustment shall be disclosed on the bill.

(b) If no complete billing information is
available for the prior three months, the volumetric usage charge shall be deemed to be fifty cents ($0.50) per day that the data is not available.

(c) If monthly submeter readings remain unavailable for more than six months, the volumetric usage charge shall be deemed to be zero for any subsequent month that the data is not available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.213.

(a) A tenant may be charged a late fee for any water service bill not paid 25 days after mailing or other transmittal of the bill. If the 25th day falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, the late fee shall not be imposed until the day after the first business day following the 25th day.

(b) (1) A late fee of up to seven dollars ($7) may be imposed if any amount of a water
service bill remains unpaid after the time described in subdivision (a). A late fee of up to ten dollars ($10) may be imposed in each subsequent bill if any amount remains unpaid.

(2) The total late fee imposed in any 12-month period upon the amount of a bill that remains unpaid shall not exceed 10 percent of the unpaid amount, exclusive of the administrative fee imposed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1954.205 and the late fee imposed pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) If any partial payments are made, they shall be credited against the bill that has been outstanding the longest.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1954.207, if the water bill remains unpaid for 180 days after the date upon which it is due or the amount of the unpaid water bill equals or exceeds two hundred dollars
($200), the landlord may terminate the tenancy in accordance with Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure with the service of a three-day notice to perform the conditions or covenants or quit upon the tenant. 

(d) Water service charges under this chapter shall not constitute rent.

(e) The water service to a dwelling unit shall not be shut off or otherwise interfered with by the landlord for any reason, including nonpayment of a bill. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a landlord or its agent may shut off water service to a dwelling unit or the property, in order to make repairs, replacements of equipment, or perform other maintenance at the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.214.

This chapter does not preclude or preempt an ordinance or regulation adopted prior to January 1, 2013, that regulates the approval of submeter types or the installation, maintenance, reading, billing, or testing of submeters and associated onsite plumbing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.215.

The rights or obligations established under this chapter shall not be waived. Any purported waiver is void.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.216.

(a) This chapter applies to the following:

(1) All dwelling units offered for rent or rented in a building where submeters were required to be installed pursuant to a building standard adopted in accordance with Section 17922.14 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) All dwelling units where submeters are used to charge a tenant
separately for water service.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to any dwelling units other than those described in subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply or create a public policy or requirement that favors or disfavors the use of a ratio utility billing system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.217.

A submetering system that measures only a portion of a dwelling unit’s water usage, including, but not limited to, a system that measures only hot water usage, shall not be subject to this chapter if the system was first put in service before January 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.218.

This chapter shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Note: Delayed operative date applies to Chapter 2.5, comprising Sections 1954.201 to 1954.219.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.219.

Any property that is required to install individual submeters pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 537) of Chapter 8 of Division 1 of the Water Code shall at all times be required to bill residents for water service pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Sec. 1954.218.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.6. Commercial Rental Control [1954.25. - 1954.31.]

1954.25.

The Legislature finds that the price charged for commercial real property is a matter of statewide concern. Price controls on commercial rents discourage expansion of commercial development and entrepreneurial enterprise. These controls also discourage competition in the open market by giving artificial price benefits to one enterprise to the disadvantage of another. Because the impact of these controls goes beyond the local boundaries within which the controls are imposed, the adverse economic consquences become statewide.

In order to prevent this statewide
economic drain from occurring, the Legislature hereby enacts a uniform system with respect to commercial rents, which shall apply to every local jurisdiction in the state. This legislative action is needed to prevent the imposition of artificial barriers on commercial rents, as well as to define those areas not included within the definition of commercial real property.

In making these findings and in enacting this chapter, the Legislature expressly declares its intent that this chapter shall not apply or be interpreted to apply to local rental controls on residential real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.26.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Owner” includes any person, acting as principal or through an agent, having the right to offer commercial real property for rent, and includes any predecessor in interest to the owner.

(b) “Price” includes any charge or fee, however denominated, for the hiring of commercial real property and includes any security or deposit subject to Section 1950.7.

(c) “Public entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 811.2 of the Government Code.

(d) “Commercial real property” includes any part, portion, or unit thereof, and any related facilities, space, or services, except the following:

(1) Any dwelling or dwelling unit subject to the provisions of Section 1940. 

(2) Any accommodation in any residential hotel, as defined in Section 50519 of the Health and Safety Code, or comparable accommodations which are specifically regulated by a public entity in structures where 20 percent or more of the accommodations are occupied by persons as their primary residence.
